Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,269
Director; duties.

The director shall be the administrative officer of the commission and shall serve the commission by gathering information, disseminating findings of fact and other information, forwarding proposals and evaluations to the Governor, the Legislature, and various state agencies, carrying out public education programs, conducting hearings and conferences, and performing other duties necessary for the proper operation of the commission.

Laws 1972, LB 1081, § 8.